Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 4
TAX LEVIES AND REVENUES

23-71-401. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board of trustees" means the local college district board of trustees authorized by law to administer the affairs of any district.

"District" means a local college district organized and existing pursuant to law.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 764, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 857, § 34, effective July 1.

23-71-402. Certification - tax revenues.

In accordance with the schedule prescribed by section 39-5-128, C.R.S., the district shall certify to the board of county commissioners of the county wherein said district is located the separate amounts necessary, in the judgment of the board of trustees, to be raised from levies against the valuation for assessment of all taxable property located within the boundaries of said district for its general, bond redemption, and capital reserve funds to defray its expenditures therefrom during its next ensuing fiscal year.

If only a portion of a district is located within a county, the board of trustees of said district shall certify the separate amounts to the board of county commissioners of each county wherein a portion of said district is located. The board of county commissioners of each such county shall levy a tax upon the taxable property located within said portion of the district included in its county at a rate sufficient to produce a pro rata share of each separate amount certified, such pro rata share to be based on the ratio of the valuation for assessment of taxable property located within that portion of said school district located within said county to the total valuation for assessment of taxable property located in the entire district; except that the rate of tax levies for said district shall be the same throughout the territorial limits of said district except for a variation in the tax levy needed for the bond redemption fund of said district, which rate may vary because of changes in the boundaries of said district.

The levy for the capital reserve fund shall not exceed four mills in any year.

Whenever, after a reorganization, any district has within its boundaries any new territory, the board of trustees of the district shall certify to the board of county commissioners the amount required during the next ensuing fiscal year to satisfy such territory's proportionate share of the obligations of the outstanding bonded indebtedness.

If, after reorganization of the district, there is any territory liable for the payment of bonded indebtedness, different either in amounts, dates of creation, or dates of interest or principal maturities, then, in certifying to the boards of county commissioners the statement of the amount necessary to be raised from levies pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, it is the duty of the board of trustees of such district to also certify to the board of county commissioners the territory which has bonded indebtedness outstanding, the legal description of the territory liable for the payment of such bonded indebtedness, or portion thereof, and the amount required during the ensuing fiscal year to meet payments of interest and principal falling due therein. A separate levy, sufficient to raise the amount so certified, shall be made against the valuation for assessment of all taxable property located within such territory. The proceeds of such levy shall be credited to the bond redemption fund of the district, but a separate account within such bond redemption fund shall be maintained to clearly reflect the amount raised from such separate levy.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 764, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, p. 858, § 35, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 1406, § 2, effective April 22.

23-71-403. Change in needed tax revenues - unlawful.

A board of trustees or a board of county commissioners shall not modify the amount certified pursuant to section 23-71-402 as needed for any fiscal year, nor shall said board of county commissioners be charged with any discretion in determining or reviewing the amounts so certified other than to ascertain if said amounts are within the limitations as prescribed by law.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 765, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 858, § 36, effective July 1.

23-71-404. County treasurer - accounts - warrants.

It is the duty of the county treasurer to keep separate accounts by funds and subsidiary accounts for the bond redemption fund of each district in his county, and said funds and accounts shall be subject to the warrants of said district. The tax revenues shall be credited to the proper fund and account, together with any penalty interest collected thereon.

If only a portion of a district is situate within the territorial limits of said county and the headquarters of said district are not located therein, the county treasurer shall transfer, at the end of each month, all moneys which have accrued to the credit of said district to the county treasurer of the county wherein the headquarters of said district is located. No warrant shall be drawn by a district situate in more than one county against its moneys except against those moneys in the custody of the county treasurer of the county wherein the district headquarters is located.

If a district warrant is presented to the county treasurer of a district situate in his county and there are no moneys or insufficient moneys to the credit of said district in the proper fund or account thereof to pay such warrant, it is the duty of said county treasurer to register such warrants in the order of presentment and endorse each such warrant "no funds". Registered warrants shall draw interest from the date of such registration and endorsement at the rate and in the manner as registered county warrants. The county treasurer shall keep a list of all warrants so registered and endorsed and furnish a copy of said list to the treasurer of said district. The county treasurer shall pay both the principal and interest of said warrants, in the order of registration, when there are sufficient moneys to the credit of the district fund or account upon which any such warrant was drawn. It is his duty to cause to be published in a newspaper with general distribution in said district for five days a notice that certain district warrants, describing said warrants by numbers and amounts, will be paid upon presentation at the expiration of said five-day notice, at which time said warrants shall cease to bear interest.

It is unlawful for a district to issue warrants in excess of the amount budgeted or appropriated to or the anticipated revenues for any fund, whichever is less, for said district's fiscal year whether or not the board of trustees of said district has elected to withdraw its moneys from the custody of the county treasurer.

It is the duty of the county treasurer to cancel all paid district warrants with a proper canceling stamp and indicate the date of payment thereof.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 765, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 1002, § 2, effective March 16.

L. 86:

(4) amended, p. 859, § 37, effective July 1.

23-71-405. Depositories.

When the board of trustees of a district has elected to have all moneys belonging to the district paid over to the treasurer of said board, the treasurer shall deposit, or cause to be deposited, all such moneys in such depositories as shall be designated by such board.

Each designated depository shall be required to give a surety bond in an amount equal to at least one hundred ten percent of the amount on deposit to the credit of the district at any time, with sureties approved by the board of trustees of the district and conditioned for the payment of all moneys on deposit to the credit of the district, upon demand of the treasurer thereof through presentation of checks, warrants, or orders. In lieu of such surety bond, the board of trustees may accept obligations of the United States or the state of Colorado or general obligation bonds of any district located within the state in an amount equal to said surety bond, and such securities shall be placed with and held in trust by some bank, other than the depository, within the state or with the Denver branch of the federal reserve bank of Kansas City, Missouri, contingent upon the issuance of a joint custody receipt subject to the joint order of the depository and the treasurer of said board and conditioned to secure and guarantee payment of all moneys on deposit to the credit of said district, upon demand of the district through presentation of a warrant or order.

Any moneys belonging to a district which are temporarily not needed in the conduct of its operations may be invested or deposited by the board of trustees of such district pursuant to the provisions of sections 24-75-601 to 24-75-603, C.R.S.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of trustees of any district may provide for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of refunding escrow agreements and accounts and may provide for payment of principal and interest on the outstanding bonds of such district by paying agents, pursuant to the provisions of parts 5 and 6 of this article.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 756, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 859, § 38, effective July 1.

23-71-406. Registered warrants by treasurer of the board of trustees.

If a board of trustees has elected to withdraw all district moneys from the temporary custody of the county treasurer and there are no moneys or insufficient moneys to the credit of the proper fund of said district on deposit with a depository to pay any warrant or order drawn against said fund, the treasurer of said board of trustees shall register said warrant in the same manner as otherwise prescribed for a county treasurer under the provisions of section 23-71-404. Registered warrants shall draw interest from the date of such registration and endorsement at the rate and in the same manner as warrants registered by the county treasurer. The treasurer of said board of trustees shall perform all duties required of the county treasurer under section 23-71-404 (3) in the registration and payment of district warrants registered by said treasurer of the board of trustees, including publication for notice of payment thereof.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 766, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 859, § 39, effective July 1.

23-71-407. Short-term loans.

The board of trustees of any district may negotiate or contract with any person, corporation, association, or company for a loan not to exceed the difference between the anticipated revenues for the current fiscal year for the general fund and the amount credited to date to said general fund in order to eliminate the necessity of issuing registered warrants upon said general fund. Such loan shall be liquidated within six months thereafter from moneys subsequently credited to said general fund. The total rate of interest, including fees to be paid on such loan, shall not exceed seventy-five percent of the discount rate set by the federal reserve board for the tenth federal reserve district establishing the rate of interest which federal reserve banks shall charge member banks when such member banks borrow money from a federal reserve bank.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 766, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 556, § 2, effective April 13.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 860, § 40, effective July 1.